Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1201
Contracts, authorized.

Individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, and corporations in this state, hereby designated as subscribers, are hereby authorized to exchange reciprocal or interinsurance contracts with each other or with individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, and corporations of other states and countries providing indemnity among themselves from any loss which may be insured against under other provisions of the laws excepting life insurance.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 1, p. 458;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 1, p. 681;

C.S.1922, § 7969;

C.S.1929, § 44-1501;

R.S.1943, § 44-1201;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 229.

Defendant was a reciprocal insurance exchange authorized under this article to write public liability automobile insurance. Davis v. Highway Motor Underwriters, 120 Neb. 734, 235 N.W. 325 (1931).